<?xml version='1.0' encoding='UTF-8'?>
<DOC><DOCNO> FR89629-0005 </DOCNO><DOCID>fr.6-29-89.f2.A1004</DOCID><TEXT><ITAG tagnum="69"><ITAG tagnum="52">21 CFR Part 700 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="41">[Docket No. 85N-0536] </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="91">RIN 0905-AC00 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="56">Cosmetics; Ban on the Use of Methylene Chloride as an Ingredient ofCosmetic Products </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>AGENCY: </T2>Food and Drug Administration.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>ACTION: </T2>Final rule. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>SUMMARY: </T2>The Food and Drug Administration (FDA) is amending itsregulations to ban the use of methylene chloride as an ingredient of cosmeticproducts. Scientific studies have shown that inhalation of methylene chloridecauses cancer in laboratory animals. The available information shows thatthe continued use of methylene chloride in cosmetic products may pose asignificant risk to human health, especially to specific segments of thepopulation that are continually exposed to aerosol cosmetics containingthis ingredient. Therefore, the agency has decided to take this actionbecause it has concluded that cosmetic products that contain methylenechloride may be injurious to users under their conditions of use.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>EFFECTIVE DATE: </T2>August 28, 1989, for products initially introducedor initially delivered for introduction into interstate commerce.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>FOR FURTHER INFORMATION CONTACT: </T2>Terry C. Troxell, Center forFood Safety and Applied Nutrition (HFF-312), Food and Drug Administration,200 C St. SW., Washington, DC 20204, 202-485-0229.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>SUPPLEMENTARY INFORMATION:</T2><ITAG tagnum="74">Table of Contents</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">I. Background</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">A. Description of Methylene Chloride</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">B. Procedural History</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">C. Description of Comments</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">II. Methylene Chloride_Decaffeination of Coffee</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">III. Introduction_Safety Assessment</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">IV. Hazard Identification_The Carcinogenicity of Methylene Chloride</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">A. Introduction</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">B. Comments on FDA's Evaluation of the Available Carcinogenicity Studies</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">C. Cytotoxicity Data and Evaluation</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">D. Genotoxicity Studies and Findings</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">V. Exposure Assessment</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">VI. Dose Response Assessment</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">A. Introduction</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">B. How to Estimate Risk</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">C. Metabolic and Pharmacokinetic Data</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">1. Comments</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">2. The Metabolic Hypothesis</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">3. FDA's Response</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">D. Epidemiology in Risk Assessment</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">1. The Kodak Study</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">2. The General Electric Study</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">VII. Characterizing the Risks</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">VIII. Other Comments</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">A. Halogenated Solvents Industry Petition</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">B. Other Agencies' Regulation of Methylene Chloride</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">C. Effective Date</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">D. Request to Reopen Record</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">IX. Summary and Conclusions</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">X. Impact Analyses</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">XI. References</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">XII. Agency Action</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="84">I. Background</ITAG>A. Description of Methylene ChlorideMethylene chloride (CAS Reg. No. 75-09-2, dichloromethane) is a colorless,volatile liquid that is used in a variety of consumer and industrial productsas a solvent and flame suppressant. The primary cosmetic use of methylenechloride has been in hair sprays. Because of its volatility, it causesquick drying and setting of the applied hair spray resin.Methylene chloride has also been used in foods as an extraction solventin the processing of coffee beans, spices, and hops. When used in thismanner, methylene chloride is a food additive within the meaning of section201(s) of the Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act (the act) (21 U.S.C.321(s)). Methylene chloride has also been used in the manufacture of food-contactarticles. In some of these cases, methylene chloride may be a food additivewithin the meaning of section 201(s) of the act, while in other cases,methylene chloride may remain as an impurity in the indirect food additive.The food uses of methylene chloride are beyond the scope of this finalrule on cosmetic uses. B. Procedural HistoryIn the <T4>Federal Register</T4> of December 18, 1985 (50 FR 51551), FDA proposedto prohibit the use of methylene chloride as an ingredient of cosmeticproducts. The agency stated that the data before it revealed that methylenechloride is carcinogenic by inhalation to the liver and lung of male andfemale mice. It also stated that the data suggested that this substancehas a tumorigenic effect on the mammary glands of female rats and producessarcomas of the salivary gland/integument of rats upon inhalation (50 FR51551). Therefore, the agency tentatively concluded that methylene chlorideis an animal carcinogen by inhalation and may be carcinogenic to humans.Epidemiology studies and other information that FDA considered at the timeof the proposal did not alter the agency's tentative conclusion. The proposaldescribed the agency's assessment of the risk to humans from exposure tomethylene chloride used in hair spray-type cosmetics. FDA estimated theupper bound lifetime risk of cancer from the lifetime use of hair sprayscontaining methylene chloride to be in the range 10^3 (1 in 1,000) to 10^4(1 in 10,000) for the consumer and in the range 10^2 (1 in 100) to 10^3(1 in 1,000) for the hair care specialist. Therefore, the agency proposedto find that the use of this substance as an ingredient in cosmetics mayrender those cosmetics injurious to the health of users. In the proposal, the agency deferred consideration of the food uses ofmethylene chloride listed in the food and color additive regulations, exceptfor its use in decaffeinating coffee beans, because the agency knew ofno indications of a hazard to the public health from these uses. With regardto its use in decaffeinating coffee, the agency stated that even thoughmethylene chloride had been shown to be carcinogenic by inhalation, noaction on this use was necessary because any risk from the low exposuresresulting from this use would be essentially nonexistent. On February 24, 1986 (51 FR 6494), the agency extended the comment periodon the proposal until April 4, 1986, to provide additional time for commentson the use of methylene chloride as a decaffeinating agent. On October10, 1986, FDA received four new studies concerning comparative pharmacokinetics,metabolism, and genotoxicity of methylene chloride. These studies weresponsored by the European Council of Chemical Manufacturers' Federation(CEFIC). The agency reopened the comment period for 30 days on December5, 1986 (51 FR 43935), to allow an opportunity for comment on these newstudies. After the close of this comment period, the agency received severaladditional submissions relevant to the methylene chloride proceeding, includingreports of studies extending the pharmacokinetic and metabolism work, tworeports on pharmacokinetic (PB-PK) modeling, and an epidemiology studyon Canadian General Electric employees. Although FDA has not formally reopenedthe comment period for this new information, the information has been ondisplay at the Dockets Management Branch (HFA-305), Food and Drug Administration,Rm 4-62, 5200 Fishers Lane, Rockville, MD 20857, in the file on this rulemakingfor several months and has been considered by the agency. C. Description of Comments About 60 comments were submitted during the comment periods from consumers,consumer groups, industry associations, and manufacturers. Three commentswere sent in during the reopened comment period on the CEFIC studies. Somecomments included data and reports of studies concerning methylene chloride.Reports of genotoxicity studies, pharmacokinetics and metabolism of methylenechloride in different mammalian species, pharmacokinetic modeling, andnew and expanded epidemiology studies were submitted. Information on humanexposure to methylene chloride was also submitted. Twelve of the comments agreed with FDA's proposal to prohibit the use ofmethylene chloride in cosmetics. Five comments expressed disagreement withthe proposed ban and argued for continued use in cosmetics. The majorityof the comments that stated a position on the use of methylene chloridein the decaffeination of coffee and wanted the use ended. Many of the commentsexpressed an opinion only and did not provide supporting data or arguments.The substantive comments relevant to the cosmetic use and FDA's responseto each are discussed below. <ITAG tagnum="84">II. Methylene Chloride_Decaffeination of Coffee </ITAG>In the proposal, the agency stated that it was not proposing to changethe existing regulation (21 CFR 173.255) authorizing the use of methylenechloride for decaffeination of coffee. The agency stated that even thoughmethylene chloride had been shown to cause cancer, the residue limitationfor this substance prescribed in andSection; 173.255(c) provided safe conditionsof use for this additive. The agency based its position on two factors.First, on evaluating the risk from use of the additive for decaffeinatingcoffee under the intended conditions of use, the agency determined thatthe potential carcinogenic risk is negligible. Second, FDA determined thatthe Delaney anticancer clause of the Food Additives Amendment (section409(c)(3)(A) of the act (21 U.S.C. 348(c)(3)(A))) does not require a banin this case because the risk is negligible, and that there would be nosignificant gain to the public health if this use of methylene chloridewere banned. This determination was based on the principle that the law does not concernitself with trifling or de minimis matters. The agency also applied thisprinciple in listing the color additives Dandamp;C Red No. 19 and Dandamp;COrange No. 17, which the agency found to be carcinogenic but to presentinsignificant risk under their prescribed conditions of use. The agency'sdecision to list these color additives was reviewed by the U.S. Court ofAppeals for the District of Columbia as a result of a suit filed by thePublic Citizen Litigation Group (<T3>Public Citizen </T3>v. <T3>Young</T3>, 831 F.2d 1108 (D.C. Cir. 1987)). In its opinion, datedOctober 23, 1987, the court held that ``* * * the Delaney Clause of theColor Additive Amendments does not contain an implicit de minimis exceptionfor carcinogenic dyes with trivial risks to humans,'' and that the listingof carcinogenic color additives is contrary to law. The court, however,made no decision about the food additive Delaney clause, stating in thediscussion on food additives:<ITAG tagnum="21">Moreover, we deal here only with the color additive Delaney clause,not the one for food additives. Although the clauses have almost identicalwording, the context is clearly different.</ITAG>On April 18, 1988, the U.S. Supreme Court denied a petition for a writof certiorari that had been filed by the Cosmetic, Toiletry and FragranceAssociation.The agency expects that it will take a substantial amount of time for itto consider what effect, if any, the court decision in <T3>Public Citizen </T3>v. <T3>Young</T3> will have on FDA's regulation of food additives, includingmethylene chloride. Therefore, to avoid further delay in acting on theproposed ban of the use of methylene chloride in cosmetics, the agencyhas decided to separate the cosmetic and food additive issues and to deferany necessary action on the food additive use of methylene chloride untila future date. FDA will consider the substantive comments that it has receivedin this rulemaking that pertain to the food additive use of methylene chloridein developing any action on this issue.<ITAG tagnum="84">III. Introduction_Safety Assessment </ITAG>In 1985, the Office of Science and Technology Policy (OSTP), in describinghow to assess the human cancer risk associated with chemical exposure,captured the essential features of any safety assessment that FDA conducts:<ITAG tagnum="21">The first [step], which is often referred to as hazard identification,entails a qualitative evaluation of both the data bearing on an agent'sability to produce carcinogenic effects and the relevance of this informationto humans. The second, exposure assessment, is concerned with the numberof individuals who are likely to be exposed and with the types, magnitudes,and durations of their anticipated exposures. The third component, hazardor dose-response assessment, uses the information on carcinogenicity fromthe hazard identification phase together with mathematical modeling techniquesto estimate the magnitude or an upper bound on the magnitude of the carcinogeniceffect at any given dose level. Finally, one may combine the informationfrom the first three components or steps to characterize the carcinogenicrisk associated with the expected human exposure to the compound of interest.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="20">[50 FR 10436 and 10437; March 14, 1985]</ITAG>The OSTP discussion also provides a convenient structure for this document.FDA will first consider the comments that it has received that bear onthe agency's evaluation of the carcinogenic hazard posed by methylene chlorideto humans. Second, it will evaluate the comments that bear on the agency'sassessment of the extent of exposure to methylene chloride from its usein cosmetics. Third, it will evaluate the comments on the magnitude ofthe hazard that those who are exposed face. Finally, the agency will considercomments on its tentative determination that the hazard is sufficientlylarge that use of methylene chloride in cosmetic products will render thoseproducts adulterated.However, before beginning this evaluation, the agency will consider a numberof comments that it received that asserted that FDA consideration of thesafety of the use of methylene chloride in cosmetics was premature.(1) Five comments received during the comment period which closed April4, 1986, stated that the agency should wait for new information from thepharmacokinetic, metabolism, and epidemiology studies that were in progressbefore reaching any conclusion on methylene chloride. A trade associationsaid it was cooperating with the National Cancer Institute (NCI) to developa new epidemiology study. It pointed out that relevant information wouldbe presented at meetings and workshops during 1986. Another trade associationstated that it was sponsoring comparative metabolic studies on methylenechloride.Adequate time has elapsed for submission of studies that were in progresswhen the proposal issued on December 18, 1985. The agency has receivedand considered in this rulemaking final reports on epidemiology, metabolism,pharmacokinetics, cytotoxicity, and genotoxicity studies that were in progressat the time of the proposal and, in some cases, that were initiated afterthe proposal was issued.The new epidemiology study that was to be done in cooperation with NCIhas not been undertaken to date. At a June 10, 1987, meeting, NCI's advisorypanel on the proposed epidemiology study recommended against proceedingwith the study because the methylene chloride exposure levels were toolow and the potential size of the cohort too small to achieve the desiredgoals (Ref. 1). While NCI apparently has not totally abandoned the possibilityof further epidemiology work, FDA does not believe that it is appropriateto delay action further for a study that has not been started and may notbe done.(2) Several comments said that the agency had not adequately reviewed theavailable metabolism, pharmacokinetics, and human epidemiology data onmethylene chloride.FDA did review the available studies on these subjects before publishingthe proposal but made only very brief comments on them because the datafrom these studies were insufficient to affect its decision. The pharmacokineticand metabolism data available before the proposal was published did notprovide convincing evidence to the agency on the mechanism of carcinogenesisof methylene chloride. Therefore, the agency was not able to use this informationin risk assessment. Furthermore, the agency could not draw any definitiveconclusions from the available epidemiology studies because of study designlimitations, such as the small number of workers and the short period ofexposure. Additional data on these and other subjects that are relatedto the toxicity of methylene chloride were submitted to the agency in responseto the proposal. FDA has carefully reviewed all of the available informationon the metabolism, pharmacokinetics, genotoxicity, cytotoxicity, and humanepidemiology of methylene chloride in reaching the decision announced inthis final rule. The agency's evaluations of these complex issues are discussedin the following sections on the individual subjects.<ITAG tagnum="85">IV. Hazard Identification_The Carcinogenicity of Methylene Chloride</ITAG>A. IntroductionThe proposal described several recent chronic studies on methylene chloride,some of which raise questions about the safety of the chemical: (1) theNational Toxicology Program (NTP) sponsored inhalation studies in ratsand mice; (2) the National Coffee Association (NCA) sponsored drinkingwater studies in rats and mice; and (3) the three inhalation studies, twoin rats and one in hamsters, performed by The Dow Chemical Co. (Dow).In the proposal, FDA stated its tentative conclusions on the carcinogenicitystudies. From the NTP mouse study, the agency concluded that ``* * * methylenechloride is carcinogenic to the liver and lung of male and female mice.This study also demonstrates that methylene chloride induces cancer ata site (the liver) remote from the tissue directly exposed by the inhalationtreatment'' (50 FR 51551).The agency also concluded that the results in the NTP rat inhalation studyare suggestive of a tumorigenic effect of methylene chloride on the mammaryglands of the female rats. FDA concluded that the observations from thisNTP rat study and from the high dose rat study conducted by Dow providesuggestive evidence that methylene chloride also induces sarcomas of thesalivary gland/integument in rats upon inhalation.There were no treatment-related neoplastic effects observed in the Dowinhalation study with hamsters or in the NCA drinking water studies withrats and mice. B. Comments on FDA's Evaluation of the Available Carcinogenicity Studies(3) In discussing the methylene chloride carcinogenicity studies, one commentsaid that several experimental studies other than the NTP bioassay havealso reported increases in mammary and liver tumors. The comment did notidentify any such studies, however. None of the carcinogenicity studies for which FDA has reports, other thanthe NTP study on mice, showed significant increases in liver tumors. TheNTP and Dow inhalation studies indicated slight increases in the incidenceof benign mammary tumors in rats. The agency cannot say conclusively thatthese increases were treatment-related effects but considers them to besuggestive evidence. The comment may be referring to studies mentioned in a talk presented byProf. C. Maltoni, Bologna, Italy, at a 1984 workshop on methylene chloride(Ref. 2). Prof. Maltoni stated in his talk that he had found an increasedincidence of mammary tumors and liver nodular hyperplasia in his methylenechloride study with rats. However, despite numerous requests by the organizersof the workshop for a manuscript of his talk to distribute to participants,including FDA toxicologists, no written reports have been received. Consequently,the agency cannot use these studies in its decision. (4) One comment contended that there is not sufficient evidence to callmethylene chloride a carcinogen because positive results from a singlestudy in a single species do not provide sufficient evidence to call asubstance a carcinogen except where unusual tumors are found that do notoccur spontaneously, or where the tumor incidence can be related to analkylating agent. FDA believes that the comment provides an incorrect description of theevidence on methylene chloride. As explained in the proposal, the agencyhas considered and carefully evaluated seven chronic studies of methylenechloride. In the NTP 2-year inhalation study in mice, methylene chloride inducedsignificantly increased incidences in alveolar/bronchiolar adenomas, alveolar/bronchiolarcarcinomas, and alveolar/bronchiolar adenomas and carcinomas (combined)in male and female mice of both dose groups compared to the controls. Methylenechloride also induced significantly increased incidences of hepatocellularadenomas in high-dose male and female mice, of hepatocellular carcinomasin high-dose males and low- and high-dose females, and of the combinedadenomas and carcinomas in all treated groups of both sexes. These increasedincidences were distinctly dose related. In addition, other biological evidence from this study is consistent withthe carcinogenic effect of methylene chloride in mice. There were dose-relatedincreases in the incidences of mice bearing multiple tumors of either thelung or liver. None of the control mice with lung tumors had more thanone lung tumor, whereas more than 37 percent of lung tumor-bearing micein both treated groups and in both sexes had multiple lung tumors. Only9 percent of control males and none of control females had multiple tumorsin the liver. In contrast, 46 percent of low-dose males, 48 percent ofhigh-dose males, 19 percent of low-dose females, and 70 percent of high-dosefemales had multiple liver tumors. The percentage of mice having both lungtumors and liver tumors also increased in a dose-related fashion (Ref.3). There is also supporting evidence from studies conducted with rats. Therewas an increase in incidence of salivary gland sarcomas in the Dow inhalationstudy with rats that appears to be related to treatment. Two of these sametumors that are rarely observed spontaneously occurred in the high dosetreatment groups of the NTP rat study. The agency also found evidence suggestiveof a tumorigenic effect of methylene chloride on the mammary glands offemale rats in both the NTP and the Dow studies. Therefore, the agency concludes that there is sufficient evidence thatmethylene chloride has a carcinogenic effect in B<T2>6</T2>C<T2>3</T2>F<T2>1</T2> mice of both sexes, and that there is supporting evidence inanother species, the rat. IARC reached a similar conclusion in its recentevaluation. It concluded that, ``There is sufficient evidence for the carcinogenicityof dichloromethane to experimental animals'' (Ref. 4). Finally, NTP concluded,with respect to their inhalation study on methylene chloride, that therewas clear evidence of carcinogenicity in B<T2>6</T2>C<T2>3</T2>F<T2>1</T2> mice and female F344 rats and some evidence of carcinogenicityin male F344 rats (Ref. 5). (5) Four comments argued that the mammary gland tumors in the rats exposedto methylene chloride in the NTP study are not evidence of true carcinogenicity.They said that these were benign tumors, and that the tumors did not progressto malignant tumors. Furthermore, the comments characterized the incidencesof the mammary tumors at the lower dose levels as within the range of historicalcontrols and the top dose response as barely above the highest incidencesin historical controls. The comments noted that IARC considers increasesof only malignant tumors as sufficient evidence of carcinogenicity, andthat the Past Presidents of the Society of Toxicology have said that whenincidence rates in treated groups are within historical control ranges,differences between treated and concurrent control groups are not biologicallysignificant. The agency has not used the mammary tumorigenic effect in rats as the primaryevidence for the carcinogenicity of methylene chloride. Rather, the agencyhas stated that the evidence of lung and liver tumors in mice providesan appropriate basis to conclude that methylene chloride is carcinogenicin mice of both sexes. As stated in response to comment 4, however, the agency believes that datafrom the rat studies provide supporting evidence of the carcinogenicityof methylene chloride. FDA also points out that, as mentioned in the comments,the incidence of mammary tumors in at least the high dose group was above,rather than within, the range of historical controls. The evidence of adose-response effect in the induction of mammary fibroadenomas in the femaleF344 rats in the NTP study is suggestive of a tumorigenic effect of methylenechloride. Observations from Dow's studies lend further support to an indicationof a tumorigenic effect of this chemical in rat mammary glands. (6) Four comments urged caution in determining carcinogenicity from theincreased incidences of the types of tumors that occur spontaneously athigh incidences in untreated groups. The comments argued that the lungand liver tumors found in mice exposed to methylene chloride in the NTPstudy are types of tumors that occur spontaneously with high and variableincidence. The comments cited statements made by several expert bodiesin support of their argument and quoted IARC as saying: `` * * * [T]hereare certain neoplasms, including lung tumors and hepatomas in mice, whichhave been considered of lesser sigificance than neoplasms occurring atother sites for the purpose of evaluating the carcinogenic risk of chemicalsto humans.'' The comments also pointed out that similar statements havebeen made in documents issued by OSTP and by the Environmental ProtectionAgency (EPA). The agency agrees with this concern and is fully aware of the difficultiesencountered in the interpretation of a tumor response at a site of highbackground incidence. Although the male B<T2>6</T2>C<T2>3</T2>F<T2>1</T2> mice have relatively high spontaneous tumor incidences in theliver and lung, the female mice generally have low background rates atthese organ sites (Ref. 6). Thus, these comments bear consideration onlyfor the males. Yet, in the NTP inhalation studies, methylene chloride wasshown to induce significant increases above the background rate in incidencesof lung and liver tumors in both sexes of mice.These increases were distinctly dose related. In addition, other biologicalevidence strongly supports the carcinogenicity of methylene chloride inboth sexes of mice. This evidence includes the increased incidences ofdosed mice bearing multiple lung or liver tumors as compared to controlmice, and the increased incidences of dosed mice having both lung and livertumors in the same animal. FDA is aware that the relevance of hepatocellular tumors in mice for predictingcancer risk in humans has been debated extensively over the past severalyears. This debate does not obviate the need for a careful evaluation ofeach study in which there is a finding of an elevated incidence of hepatocellulartumors and a determination as to whether the finding is valid. Finally, even though IARC holds the general position cited in the comments,IARC itself concluded in the specific case of methylene chloride that thereis sufficient evidence for its carcinogenicity in animals (Ref. 4). (7) Two comments took issue with a point in the proposal that they understoodto be a statement that the salivary gland sarcomas in treated rats in theNTP study provide suggestive evidence of carcinogenicity. One comment arguedthat these sarcomas lack significance. This comment argued that the agency'sapparent position was unwarranted because the NTP draft transcript indicatedthat there was no evidence of salivary gland anomalies related to treatment,and because one such tumor was found in a control rat in the earlier Dowstudy. The other comment stated that these sarcomas are not discussed inthe draft NTP report.In the proposal, FDA considered the significance of the Dow and NTP resultstogether. The agency pointed out that there was an increased incidenceof male rats with sarcomas in the region of the salivary gland in the high-doseDow inhalation study, and that there were two sarcomas of the salivarygland/integument in treated rats in the NTP study. The fact that theserare tumors were seen in the NTP study adds some credibility to the resultsof the Dow study even though by themselves the occurrence of these twotumors would arouse little suspicion. Therefore, FDA does not find anysignificance in the fact that NTP did not discuss these tumors. FDA pathologists have had the opportunity to review the morphologic characteristicsof the salivary gland sarcomas seen in Dow's inhalation study in Sprague-Dawleyrats (Ref. 7) and of the two salivary gland sarcomas in the NTP study withF344 rats. The morphologic pattern of the latter tumors is unusual butsimilar to that of the salivary gland sarcomas found in the Dow study.The agency considers the presence of two unusual salivary gland tumorsin the NTP study and the occurrence of a larger number of salivary glandsarcomas in the Dow study to be suggestive evidence of a treatment relatedeffect. (8) One comment stated a belief that the agency used data for calculatingpotency different from those data given in the draft NTP report for thefemale mice treated by inhalation of 2,000 parts per million (ppm) methylenechloride. The comment stated that this belief was based on a calculationusing the cancer potency of 4.4andmultiply;10^4 (mg/kg/day)^1 (i.e., 4.4andmultiply;10^4per milligram per kilogram of body weight per day) stated by the agencyin the proposal.The agency did use the dose and tumor incidence data that were presentedin the draft NTP report in calculating the carcinogenic potency of methylenechloride. However, the agency described the calculations only in generalterms in the proposal. The following discussion provides further details.FDA computed the carcinogenic potency as the risk (the probability thatan animal will develop a tumor) divided by the dose that produced thatrisk (Ref. 8). To estimate the risk, the agency considered the lung andliver neoplasia of the 2,000 ppm-treated female mice to be independentand added them together. Therefore, the sum of the tumor incidences inthis group of mice becomes approximately 100 percent (33 percent for liverneoplasms plus 63 percent for the lung neoplasms, as reported in the NTPreport). To calculate the dose, the ageney converted dose expressed inair concentration (ppm) to a body weight (bw) basis. For methylene chloride,1 ppm=0.0035 milligram per liter (mg/L). Thus, 2,000 ppm=7 mg/L. The micewere dosed 6 hours per day for 5 days out of 7. Using an inhalation rateof 0.025 liter per minute (L/minute) for the mouse, the time weighted averagedose is 7 mg/Landmultiply;0.025 L/minuteandmultiply;60 minutes/hourandmultiply;6hours/dayandmultiply;5 out of 7 days=45 mg/day. For a 20-gram-mouse, thedose thus becomes 45 mg/day/0.020 kg=2250 mg/kg bw/day. Therefore, thecarcinogenic potency=1/2250=4.4andmultiply;10^4 (mg/kg bw/day)^1. C. Cytotoxicity Data and Evaluation (9) Some comments declared that the lung tumors in the mouse could be explainedby the cytotoxicity of methylene chloride to the nonciliated bronchiolarepithelial (Clara) cells in the lungs. They said that the Clara cell hadbeen shown to be the cell of origin of lung tumors for several chemicals.They suggested that the sensitivity of the Clara cells to methylene chlorideseen in the mouse was not likely to occur in humans. The comments submittedevidence to support the point that there is Clara cell injury in mice,but not in rats, when exposed to methylene chloride and argued that thisfinding correlated with the occurrence of lung tumors in mice but not inrats. The comments also submitted evidence that they believed demonstrated thatthe cytotoxicity of methylene chloride resulted in the loss of the abilityof Clara cells to metabolize methylene chloride by one (the mixed functionoxidase (MFO) pathway, also referred to as the cytochrome P-450 pathway)of the two known metabolic pathways (a sequence of enzyme-catalyzed reactionsby which a cell metabolizes a compound) for methylene chloride. They arguedthat the loss of this pathway would result in greater metabolism by thesecond metabolic pathway (the glutathione-S-transferase (GST) pathway)and ``have a significant impact on the risk of those cells becoming malignant''because, these comments believe, the GST metabolism is responsible forthe lung and liver tumors. One comment pointed out that the number, distribution,and ultrastructural morphology of Clara cells in mouse lungs are differentfrom those in humans and other animals.In support of these comments, reports entitled ``Methylene Chloride (Dichloromethane):10-Day Inhalation Toxicity Study to Investigate the Effeets on Rat andMouse Liver and Lungs'' and ``Methylene Chloride (Dichloromethane): TheEffects of Exposure to 4000 ppm on Mouse Lung Enzymes,'' conducted by ImperialChemical Industries, were submitted (Refs. 9 and 10). The agency has evaluated both of these studies. While the results of thesestudies on the cytotoxicity of methylene chloride may be relevant to theobserved lung cancer induction in mice, the agency finds that at best theyprovide, as stated by the investigators, only circumstantial evidence thatthe Clara cell is the cell of origin of the lung tumors in the case ofmethylene chloride. The reported cytotoxicity to the Clara cells was observedin 10-day studies. Cytotoxicity studies of this duration are not adequateto explain the mechanism by which mice get lung tumors after 2 years oftreatment. Scientific debate persists on the cells of origin of chemically-inducedlung tumors in mice. Some investigators believe that the lung tumors inmice are derived solely from alveolar type II cells. Some assume that theyarise from Clara cells. Others believe that lung tumors in mice may arisefrom either alveolar type II or Clara cells (Refs. 11 and 12). NTP, inthe report on the bioassay of methylene chloride, did not identify thecell of origin of the mouse lung tumors. It classified the tumors onlyas alveolar/bronchiolar adenomas or carcinomas (Ref. 5).Consequently, the agency concludes that the evidence submitted with thecomment does not support the claim that the lung tumors arise from cytotoxiceffects on the Clara cells, or that the Clara cells are necessarily thecell of origin of the lung tumors. The relationship, if any, among thecytotoxic effects in the Clara cells observed during subacute exposureto methylene chloride; the lung cancer, a chronic effect found in the NTPstudy on mice; and potential carcinogenesis in humans, is not clear.D. Genotoxicity Studies and Findings(10) Three comments argued that methylene chloride is not carcinogenicfor humans. In support of this argument, the comments asserted that methylenechloride is not genotoxic because it does not act directly on mammaliandeoxyribonucleic acid (DNA). They pointed out that the available experimentsdid not show alkylation of DNA, or unscheduled DNA synthesis (UDS), bymethylene chloride in rats or mice. One comment discussed a number of mutagenicitystudies and concluded that, although there were some positive genotoxicresponses to methylene chloride in some bacteria, yeasts, and plants, theeffects in these simpler systems do not necessarily bear on animal cells.The comments asserted that the genotoxicity testing that has been donein animal cells, including a micronucleus test, yielded doubtful or negativeresults.The comments argued that this information should be used in evaluatingthe mechanism of cancer induction because it suggests that methylene chloridecauses only a secondary effect on DNA, and that this secondary effect shouldhave a threshold below which no carcinogenic effect would be expected.A consumer organization argued that the micronucleus test for genetic damagesheds little light on the potential for methylene chloride to be hazardousto humans.The agency has evaluated the relevant studies on the genotoxicity of methylenechloride, including new studies that were submitted with the comments.The agency does not agree that methylene chloride has been shown to benongenotoxic. After evaluating all the available data (Ref. 13), includingthe above mentioned studies, the agency concludes that the evidence onthe genotoxicity of methylene chloride is inconclusive.Methylene chloride was positive in several types of tests (Ref. 13). Theagency finds that methylene chloride induces mutation in <T3>Salmonella typhimurium, Escherichia coli</T3>, and mouse lymphoma cells;gene conversion and mitotic recombination in <T3>Saccharomyces cerevisiae</T3>; chromosomal aberrations in Chinese hamsterovary cells; DNA damage in <T3>E. coli</T3>; and transformation in SA7 adenovirus-infected Syrianhamster embryo cells, mouse BALB/3T3 cells, and Fischer 344 rat cells infectedwith C-type virus. The results on induction of sister chromatid exchangewere positive in one study and negative in another study, although thereasons for this discrepancy are not clear. The agency places greater weighton the positive result because the effect was reproduced in different testsperformed within the study.Methylene chloride was negative in other tests (Ref. 13). It did not inducesex-linked recessive lethal mutations in <T3>Drosophila melanogaster</T3>; micronuclei in mouse bone marrow; orUDS in rat hepatocytes, primary human fibroblasts, and hamster V79 cells.The results of the in vivo DNA binding study with rat and mouse liver andlung also were negative under the experimental conditions employed.The agency believes that the results in some studies that were reportedto be negative are questionable (Ref. 13). The negative results of thein vitro and in vivo/in vitro studies for UDS with mouse hepatocytes arequestionable because of the lack of cytotoxicity information on mouse hepatocytesexposed to methylene chloride in vitro or in vivo and because of the slightbut significant increases in the percentage of cells in repair which suggeststhat a higher concentration might induce a positive response. The resultsof the tests for chromosomal aberrations in rat bone marrow are also questionablebecause, in addition to the more commonly observed chromatid and chromosomalbreaks, an exchange figure and rings, which are significant chromosomalaberrations, were observed at the two highest doses tested. Finally, althoughno actual data were included in the report on a micronucleus test in <T3>Tradescantia paludosa</T3>, the summary table in the report indicatesthat the response was borderline.The agency does not agree that the genotoxic effects observed in the assayson methylene chloride are not relevant to animal cells. A simple demarcationbetween different kinds of cells cannot be made. Although there were bothpositive and negative results with methylene chloride, positive responseswere obtained with various types of cells, including animal cells, andthese findings indicate that this chemical is potentially genotoxic toanimal cells. Data obtained in the cell transformation assays togetherwith that from the genetic assays appear to signal the potential oncogenicityof methylene chloride.The agency also cannot agree with the hypothesis that methylene chlorideacts through a secondary mechanism rather than a direct effect on DNA.Although the genetic toxicology assay results are not conclusive, giventhese results, the agency cannot exclude the possibility that methylenechloride has a direct genotoxic effect on animal DNA.Therefore, the agency concludes that the genotoxicity studies do not providea basis on which to conclude that methylene chloride is not carcinogenicfor humans.<ITAG tagnum="84">V. Exposure Assessment</ITAG>(11) One comment agreed broadly with FDA's findings on human exposure levelsfrom the use of methylene chloride in cosmetics and submitted a reviewof available information on exposure from consumer and professional useof hair spray containing methylene chloride to assist the agency in thisrulemaking. The review included studies involving fluorocarbons and dimethylether and two reports on methylene chloride that the agency had not evaluatedearlier.FDA has evaluated the information submitted concerning exposure to methylenechloride from aerosol cosmetics. The new data do not differ substantiallyfrom the data that FDA previously used. The agency concludes that its tentativefindings are appropriate (Ref. 14).(12) One comment discussed the calculation of 8-hour time-weighted averageexposure estimates for humans through hair spray use. The comment statedthat FDA prorated the mouse inhalation exposure to a 24-hour time-weightedaverage without similarly prorating the human exposure to the same basisand said that this procedure is incorrect.The comment is incorrect. In calculating the risks discussed in the proposal,the agency used two different dose-scaling methods for comparing the exposureof the mice in the NTP inhalation study to the probable exposure of humans(Ref. 8). These methods employ 24-hour time-weighted average concentrationsof methylene chloride, one expressed in parts per million in air and onein milligrams of methylene chloride per kilogram body weight per day. Ineach case, the agency used the same 24-hour time-weighted basis for humansas for mice. The risks that were discussed in the proposal do not changeif an 8-hour time-weighted average exposure is used for both species ratherthan a 24-hour time-weighted average exposure.<ITAG tagnum="84">VI. Dose Response Assessment </ITAG>A. Introduction In the proposal, the agency estimated the risk from the use of methylenechloride in cosmetics by extrapolating from the incidence of benign andmalignant neoplasms in female mice exposed to 2,000 ppm methylene chloridein the NTP study to average human exposure from use of the aerosol cosmetics.For the extrapolation, the agency assumed a linear dose-response model.By this procedure, FDA estimated the upper bound lifetime risk of cancerfrom the use of hair sprays containing methylene chloride to be in therange 10^3 (1 in 1,000) to 10^4 (1 in 10,000) for the consumer and in therange 10^2 (1 in 100) to 10^3 (1 in 1,000) for the hair care specialist.B. How to Estimate Risk (13) Some comments stated that FDA should use the principles outlined inthe OSTP document ``Chemical Carcinogens: A Review of the Science and ItsAssociated Principles, February 1985'' as guidelines for doing risk assessment(50 FR 10372; March 14, 1985). The agency has adopted the principles for doing risk assessment of chemicalsthat are set out in the OSTP review and has applied them in the risk assessmentfor methylene chloride. For example, the agency has used low dose linearityin its risk extrapolation for methylene chloride as recommended in theOSTP document for cases, like methylene chloride, where there is uncertaintyabout the mechanism of carcinogenicity. (14) Two comments stated that the agency should incorporate all availabledata into its risk evaluation process and should make a best estimate oftrue risk for methylene chloride, not just a worst-case analysis. The agency incorporates all the available data into its risk assessmentprocess to the extent that it is appropriate to do so based on considerationssuch as validation of studies and uncertainties in the data. The agencyuses upper bound estimates of risk to account for the uncertainties inthe data and in the risk assessment procedures. Because of these uncertainties,attempts to develop ``best'' estimates of true risk may underestimate truerisk in specific instances. Therefore, to avoid underestimating risk, theagency relies upon upper bound estimates in making regulatory decisionsthat involve the public health. (15) Two comments said that the agency's quantitative risk estimates arehighly exaggerated because of many conservative assumptions. They suggestedthat the agency use a more realistic risk assessment model. They contendedthat the risks from the use of methylene chloride in hair spray are notsignificant. One of these comments referred to a similar comment it hadsent to FDA earlier complaining that FDA's Sensitivity of the Method  (SOM)Carcinogen Policy [50 FR 45530; October 31, 1985] also exaggerated riskestimation in the context of carcinogenesis in certain animal drugs. The agency agrees that the risk estimates from exposure to methylene chloridediscussed in the proposal may be exaggerated. In fact, the agency characterizedits risk estimates as being an upper bound. To assure public health protection,however, FDA believes that risk assessment procedures should include upperbound estimates. FDA, in its risk assessment for methylene chloride, usedconservative assumptions where data relating to any particular elementof the assessment were either absent or inconclusive. On the other hand,FDA agrees that the best available information should be used to avoidunnecessarily conservative estimates. As discussed elsewhere in this document, the agency has now incorporatedinto its risk assessment every valid piece of information available toit. Having used this information, the agency finds that the estimated upperbound risks from the use of aerosol cosmetics that contain methylene chlorideare high enough that it is appropriate to conclude that the use of thesecosmetics may be injurious to the health of consumers and of hair careprofessionals. The SOM rulemaking resulted in the promulgation of regulations to dealwith cancer-causing residues in edible products of food-producing animalsas the result of administration of drugs, food additives, or color additivesand, therefore, is not directly relevant to this rulemaking on methylenechloride in cosmetics. Although the principles underlying the SOM approachare similar to those used here to estimate the risk, the estimation ofrisk under the SOM approach is more complex because of the need to assesstwo exposures, exposure of the animal to the drug or additive and exposureof the human to the carcinogenic residue remaining in the animal. All issuesrelating to exaggeration in the SOM risk estimation were addressed in thatrulemaking. (16) A few comments said that the agency should not use a nonthresholdmodel for risk extrapolation for methylene chloride but should considerthat the situation may have a threshold. They claimed that methylene chlorideis not a genotoxic carcinogen. The selection of the appropriate model for estimating cancer risks at lowdoses is often extremely difficult because of the lack of information onthe mechanism of carcinogenesis and on the dose response for the chemical.In most cases, the models require many theoretical assumptions about themathematical form of the dose-response relationship and the mechanismsunderlying the cancer induction. A great deal of uncertainty still remains about the mechanism of actionof methylene chloride. Questions about the genotoxicity of methylene chloride,and about how metabolism of this substance affects its carcinogenicity,have not been convincingly resolved. Therefore, the agency does not believethat the available evidence is sufficient to show that a threshold existsfor tumor induction by methylene chloride or to show how to determine thatthreshold, if one does exist. In the absence of convincing evidence fora threshold or of knowledge of the mechanism of carcinogenesis, as an agencycharged with protection of the public health, FDA will continue to relyon a nonthreshold procedure to estimate risk for exposures below the measureddose response.C. Metabolic and Pharmacokinetic Data<ITAG tagnum="81">1. Comments </ITAG>(17) FDA received three comments in response to the proposal that, basedon how methylene chloride is metabolized in certain animals, advocatedthe use of a physiologically-based pharmacokinetic (PB-PK) model approachfor estimating the risk from methylene chloride. In May 1986, the agencyreceived a preprint of a paper by Andersen et al. on the PB-PK model andrisk assessment for methylene chloride (Ref. 15). (The agency had receivedpreliminary drafts of this paper from Dr. Richard Reitz of Dow before publicationof the December 1985 proposal.) In October 1986, CEFIC submitted paperson in vivo inhalation pharmacokinetics and metabolism of methylene chloridein rats and mice (Ref. 18) and on in vitro metabolism of methylene chloridein rat, mouse, and hamster liver and lung fractions and in human liverfractions (Ref. 19). On December 5, 1986, FDA reopened the comment period for public commenton these studies, as well as on two studies concerning the genotoxicityof methylene chloride that were also submitted by CEFIC in October 1986(51 FR 43935). FDA received three comments during the reopened comment period. Two commentssimply stated that the studies were of excellent quality and should beaccepted by the agency. The third comment was from a consumer organization.It stated that the four CEFIC studies do not support CEFIC's contentionthat methylene chloride is not carcinogenic to humans. The comment pointedout that no correlations between a metabolic pathway and lung cancer inhumans can be made because human lung tissue has not been tested. The commentquestioned the relevance of in vitro studies to in vivo conditions becausespecies may differ in various ways that affect the reactions in intactorganisms. In addition, the comment noted that the metabolic studies donot explain the bioassay evidence for carcinogenicity in rats. It alsoemphasized that different species may differ in the organ site affectedand in sensitivity to a carcinogen. After the close of the December 1986 comment period several more reportswere submitted by CEFIC and Dr. Reitz. In July 1987, Dr. Reitz submitteda report on in vitro studies on GST metabolism of methylene chloride inpreparations from mouse, rat, and hamster lung and liver tissues and humanliver tissues and on the implications of the results of these studies forPB-PK based risk estimation (Ref. 20). In November 1987, CEFIC submittedthree additional reports on methylene chloride: (1) A report on in vivoinhalation pharmacokinetics in mice and rats (Ref. 21), (2) a report onin vitro GST metabolism in rat, mouse, hamster, and human liver cytosolfractions (Ref. 22), and (3) a report on the effects of exposure to 4,000ppm methylene chloride on mouse lung enzymes (Ref. 10). In early 1988,Dr. Reitz submitted a preprint of a scientific paper on in vitro metabolismstudies of methylene chloride, incorporation of these data into the PB-PKmodel for methylene chloride, and risk estimation (Ref. 16). In June 1988,CEFIC submitted a report on human risk assessment of methylene chloridebased on PB-PK modeling that incorporated CEFIC's recent pharmacokineticand metabolism results and on two risk extrapolation procedures (Ref. 17).<ITAG tagnum="81">2. The Metabolic Hypothesis</ITAG>The comments from CEFIC, Dr. Reitz, and colleagues argued that the evidencesubmitted in response to the proposal, as well as the considerable bodyof research existing before the proposal, support the following hypothesis:Methylene chloride is metabolized via two metabolic pathways in mammals(Ref. 23). These pathways (according to this hypothesis) account for virtuallyall of the metabolism of methylene chloride. One pathway is the mixed functionoxidase (MFO) pathway, also referred to as the cytochrome P450 pathway.This oxidative pathway is located in the smooth endoplasmic reticulum ofcells and is present in the human, rat, hamster, and mouse. It saturates(i.e., higher dose levels of methylene chloride do not significantly increasethe amount of this substance that is metabolized by this pathway) at about500 ppm inhalation exposure in rats and mice. The second pathway is referred to as the GST pathway. This pathway is locatedin the soluble fraction of the cytoplasm and produces carbon dioxide asthe end product (Ref. 24). This pathway does not saturate at high dosesand is more active in its metabolism of methylene chloride in the mousethan in humans or in other mammals. The comments hypothesized that reactive intermediates produced during themetabolism of methylene chloride by the GST pathway cause changes thatlead ultimately to the formation of tumors found in the NTP bioassay onthe mouse. The comments postulated further that neither methylene chlorideitself nor the intermediates or products of the MFO pathway contributeto this carcinogenic effect. The theory presented in these comments uses a PB-PK model for assessingand comparing the internal exposure of tissues to toxic chemicals and theirmetabolites in mammalian species. The PB-PK model mathematically simulatesthe absorption, distribution, metabolism, and elimination of methylenechloride in different species. These comments argued that with the useof the proper anatomical, physiological, and metabolic parameters, thePB-PK model approach allows the use of the ``internal dose'' to the targetorgan in the quantitative assessment of risk. The comments argued thatuse of this internal dose is more appropriate than use of the externaldose of the parent compound and permits more realistic high dose to lowdose and interspecies extrapolations in the quantitative assessment ofrisk.The comments stated that the metabolic data and PB-PK modeling correlatewell with the bioassay data and thus support the hypothesis that the GSTpathway produces the carcinogenic metabolite. They pointed to the relativelyhigh levels of GST metabolites in mouse lung and liver, where tumors wereproduced, as compared to the levels calculated with the PB-PK model forthe respective organs in the rat and hamster, in which no increased incidencesof liver or lung tumors were observed. The comments also argued that, in contrast, the metabolic data for theMFO pathway do not correlate well with the bioassay findings for the lungand liver. The comments pointed out that the metabolism studies by Greenet al., Reitz et al., and others have shown that MFO metabolism approachessaturation at exposure levels lower than those used in the inhalation bioassayon the mouse. Once saturation is reached, concentration of MFO metabolicproducts would not increase with increasing dose levels of methylene chloride.If an MFO metabolite were responsible for the cancer, the comments argued,then cancer incidence also should not increase at dose levels above thesaturation dose. Yet, there is a dose-related increase in cancer incidencewith methylene chloride at doses above MFO pathway saturation in the mousestudy. In addition, the hamster bioassay was negative even though the MFOmetabolic rates in the liver preparations were comparable to the ratesin the mouse preparations. For these reasons, the comments concluded thatthe MFO pathway does not produce a carcinogenic metabolite during metabolismof methylene chloride. In support of their claim that the parent, unmetabolized methylene chlorideis not responsible for the cancer induction in the NTP inhalation bioassay,the comments contended that methylene chloride has a very low level ofchemical reactivity. They argued that therefore it is unlikely that thissubstance can directly react with DNA, and that, if it could, methylenechloride would be expected to be an extremely weak alkylating agent. The comments stated that the pharmacokinetic data of Green et al. (Ref.18) show higher blood, and presumably lung and liver, concentrations ofmethylene chloride in rats than in mice inhaling 2,000 ppm or 4,000 ppmof methylene chloride. They stated that the induction by methylene chlorideof liver and lung tumors only in mice and not in rats supports their postulatethat unmetabolized methylene chloride is not responsible for inducing tumors.The comments included data on in vitro metabolism of preparations madefrom a limited number of human liver and 2 human lung autopsy samples.The comments stated that the evidence shows that the activity of the GSTpathway is at least 10 times lower in human liver and lung than in therespective tissues in the mouse. Furthermore, because of the relativelyweak affinity of methylene chloride to the GST enzyme, the MFO pathwaywould metabolize a greater proportion of the methylene chloride than theGST pathway at the very low exposures typically encountered by humans ascompared to the high dose levels used in the mouse bioassay, where theMFO pathway became saturated. Based on the hypothesized carcinogenic metabolicpathway, the metabolism data, PB-PK modeling, and several quantitativerisk extrapolation procedures, the comments concluded that the ``internaldose'' of GST metabolites in lung and liver is small for humans exposedto methylene chloride from hair sprays, and that the carcinogenic riskto the lung and the liver presented by this use is insignificant. The crucial postulates for the mechanism of methylene chloride carcinogenicityproposed by the comments are: (1) The metabolism of methylene chloridein mice, rats, hamsters, and humans by two and only two significant pathways,(2) the lack of direct carcinogenic activity of methylene chloride itselfat all doses, (3) the lack of carcinogenic activity of MFO metabolitesat all doses and the saturation of this pathway at higher doses, and (4)the carcinogenicity of GST metabolites and their increased importance athigher doses as the metabolism of methylene chloride is increasingly shiftedto the GST pathway. The evidence bearing on these propositions is discussedbelow. In brief, the agency believes that the evidence appears to supportpostulates (1) and (3), but it has significant reservations about the validityof postulates (2) and (4). <ITAG tagnum="81">3. FDA's Response </ITAG>The agency did not use either metabolic data or pharmacokinetic modelsin the risk assessment that it published in the proposal of December 18,1985, although it did consider them. At the time of publication of theproposal, the agency did not believe that the available pharmacokineticinformation on methylene chloride was sufficiently complete for it to acceptthe hypothesized mechanism and the model based on this mechanism, or forit to adjust the estimated risk for either the lung or liver tumors onthe basis of this mechanism. In developing this final rule, the agency has evaluated all studies relevantto the pharmacokinetics and metabolism of methylene chloride, particularlythe new information submitted in response to the proposal, and consideredtheir impact on the risk assessment that FDA has done for this chemical(Ref. 25). Based on the available evidence, the agency agrees that the MFO and GSTpathways appear to be the principal metabolic routes of elimination ofmethylene chloride.The agency also agrees that the submitted in vivo and in vitro metabolicdata support the postulated saturation of the MFO pathway at high doses.The agency believes that the observed correlation between the PB-PK modelpredictions of MFO metabolite levels in the target organs and the bioassayresults in rodents is consistent with the postulated lack of carcinogenicactivity for the MFO metabolites. Moreover, the agency believes that the results of the pharmacokineticsand metabolism studies, as well as of the PB-PK modeling, show a correlationbetween GST metabolism data and certain bioassay results. In vitro GSTmetabolic activity is high in the mouse liver, where methylene chloridecaused cancer in the NTP bioassay, and in vitro GST activity is lower ornot detected in rat and hamster lung and liver, where no increase in incidenceof cancer was observed. However, there is an apparent contradiction of the hypothesis from thedata reported for GST metabolism in mouse lung tissue. The contradictionis that in vitro GST metabolic activity in lung tissue is only a smallfraction of the activity in mouse liver tissue. Nevertheless, lung tumorswere induced at approximately the same level as liver tumors. Moreover,in rat liver tissue the in vitro GST metabolic activity was greater thanin mouse lung tissue. However, liver tumors were not induced in the rat.To explain this apparent contradiction, CEFIC hypothesized that the Claracell is the cell of origin of pulmonary tumors, and that most of the metabolismtakes place in these cells. CEFIC postulated that, because Clara cellsmake up only about 5 percent of lung tissue, and presumably the amountof GST metabolism is proportionately higher in these cells than in theother cells of the lung, the Clara cells may be exposed to considerablyhigher levels of GST metabolites than other pulmonary cells. CEFIC arguedthat this could explain the contradiction because the Clara cells wouldbe exposed to comparable levels of GST metabolites as mouse liver tissue.As discussed in comment 9, the cell of origin of the lung cancer in themouse was not identified by NTP or anyone else. Furthermore, the comment'spostulate on the cellular origin of the lung tumors is based in part onthe assumption that the GST metabolic activity of Clara cells is high ascompared to the GST metabolic activity of other types of lung cells inthe mouse. No data on relative GST pathway metabolic activity with methylenechloride in different lung cells were presented to support this assertion.The agency concludes that the submitted evidence does not demonstrate thatthe Clara cell is the cell of origin of the lung tumors in the mouse, orthat GST pathway metabolism of methylene chloride is elevated in thesecells. Thus, the contradiction described above remains unexplained. A further problem in accepting the hypothesis that methylene chloride inducescancer in animals through the production of GST metabolites is that proponentshave not provided a clear and self-consistent picture of this mechanism.On the one hand, they argued that the GST pathway produces a genotoxicintermediate that was responsible for the cancer observed in the NTP studywith mice (Ref. 26). On the other hand, they argued that methylene chlorideproduces its effects by a nongenotoxic mechanism and asserted that a thresholdmodel would be most appropriate for risk extrapolation of the PB-PK calculated``internal'' dose of the GST metabolites presumably because these metabolitesare nongenotoxic (Refs. 15 and 26). Such inconsistencies with respect tothe mechanism make it more difficult for the agency to credit the hypothesis.Another problem relates to the role of the parent, unmetabolized methylenechloride in carcinogenesis. The arguments presented in the comments thatparent, unmetabolized methylene chloride plays no direct role in the inductionof cancer by inhalation have some merit. However, in the mouse bioassay,the cells lining the lung in particular are continuously exposed to highconcentrations of the parent, unmetabolized methylene chloride upon inhalation.The comments have not demonstrated that the parent methylene chloride playsno role in the carcinogenicity, especially in the lung. That methylenechloride has not been found to interact with DNA in rodent liver and lungmay be the result of inadequate sensitivity of current methods. It is knownthat methylene chloride is mutagenic in some tests with microorganismswhere there is no metabolic activation through added microsomal preparations.Also, it is possible that the parent methylene chloride may induce tumorsby a mechanism that does not involve DNA alkylation. The evidence cited by the comments does not differentiate between the casefor unmetabolized methylene chloride and the case for some metabolite fromthe GST pathway being responsible for tumor induction. The exposure ofthe lung to both unmetabolized methylene chloride and metabolites fromthe GST pathway increases with increasing external dose of methylene chlorideas does the incidence of lung tumors. The evidence only appears to ruleout any substantial role for metabolites from the MFO pathway. (This pathwayis saturated at high doses, and the amount of MFO metabolites do not increasewith increasing dose. Thus, this saturation is inconsistent with the observedtumor incidence in the mouse which does increase with increasing dose.)Moreover, not only is it possible that unmetabolized methylene chlorideis solely responsible for inducing the lung tumors in the mouse, but morethan one chemical species, methylene chloride and one or more of its metabolicderivatives, could be responsible. If unmetabolized methylene chlorideis involved in the induction of lung tumors, either alone or in combinationwith metabolites, the PB-PK model predicts that there will be no significantalteration of risk by using ``internal'' dose from that presented in theproposal using external dose. Furthermore, the agency believes that the lack of lung and liver tumorsin the rats, which were exposed to high levels of methylene chloride, couldhave resulted from factors other than difference in metabolism, such asa difference in intrinsic sensitivity between mouse and rat. In addition, as discussed in the proposal and comments 4, 5, and 7, thereis suggestive evidence of a tumorigenic effect of methylene chloride onmammary glands and salivary glands in rats for which no mechanistic orpharmacokinetic information is available. The comments have not met their burden of demonstrating that the adjustmentsin the risk assessment that they have suggested are appropriate. Therefore,the agency concludes that the estimated risk to humans should not be changedfrom the estimates in the proposal based on the pharmacokinetic and metabolicdata and hypothesized GST metabolic mechanism of carcinogenicity. D. Epidemiology in Risk Assessment <ITAG tagnum="81">1. The Kodak Study </ITAG>(18) Seven comments contended that the agency should use the data fromhuman epidemiology studies in the evaluation of methylene chloride. Someof these comments said that the new information in an expanded study onKodak employees exposed to methylene chloride is now adequate to be used,instead of animal testing data, to analyze the risks from methylene chlorideuse. They also stated that the epidemiology data do not indicate a riskof cancer for humans from use of methylene chloride.On the other hand, one comment stated that epidemiological studies on methylenechloride are inadequate to determine carcinogenicity in humans becauseof design limitations, such as small sample size, ill-defined exposurelevels, and insufficient latency periods. A cohort of employees chronically exposed to methylene chloride at theEastman Kodak facility in Rochester, NY, has been followed since 1964,and its mortality experience has been examined (Refs. 27, 28, and 29).The agency has reviewed the reports on this epidemiology study as completelyas possible (Refs. 30, 31, and 32).The agency finds that the most recent update on the Eastman Kodak studyon the chronic health effects of methylene chloride contains improvementsover the original report on this study (Ref. 27) and the 1980 update (Ref.28), including a larger sample of workers, improved exposure estimates,and an effective average latency period. The agency also finds, however,that because the average levels at which the Kodak employees were exposedto methylene chloride were very low, the study has only a limited abilityto detect an increase in cancer risk. Hearne et al. in the most recent update of this study (Ref. 29), draw twomajor conclusions from their analysis: (1) That the epidemiology data showno adverse health effects associated with exposure to methylene chloridethrough 1984, and (2) that predictions of risk of neoplasia to humans basedupon extrapolation from methylene chloride animal studies are ``clearlyinconsistent'' with human experience. FDA agrees that the study did notdetect an increased risk of cancer among employees exposed to methylenechloride. However, FDA's analysis of the available data shows that theupper bound potency (unit risk) implied by the human epidemiology studyis consistent with the risk estimated from animal data (Ref. 31). To compare the results of the epidemiology study with the animal bioassayevidence on the carcinogenicity of methylene chloride, the Kodak investigatorsused the cancer incidence of the NTP mouse study to calculate the excessnumber of methylene chloride-exposed workers (that is, the number abovethe background rate) predicted to die through 1984 from lung or liver cancer.The upper bound on the excess lung and liver cancer deaths that might occurin humans through 1984 that the investigators calculated based on the animaldata was larger than the number of such deaths actually found by the epidemiologystudy. For this reason, the Kodak investigators concluded that the animaldata are inappropriate for estimating the risk of methylene chloride tohumans. However, in extrapolating from the animal data to estimate this upper boundon the excess worker deaths expected, the Kodak investigators used a numberof assumptions and adjustment factors that FDA does not believe are valid(Ref. 31). Using what FDA believes to be more realistic interspecies comparativeassumptions and lifetime adjustment factors, the agency calculated thatfar fewer excess lung and liver cancer deaths would be expected through1984 among the methylene chloride-exposed workers than were predicted bythe Kodak investigators (Ref. 31). The Kodak investigators concluded only that the potential upper bound humanrisk of methylene chloride, calculated using linear-at-low-dose extrapolationfrom the animal data, is clearly inconsistent with the epidemiology results.This conclusion is hardly surprising, however, since it is of course unlikelythat the actual risk of dying from lung or liver cancer is as high as theconservatively estimated upper bound risk. The actual risk can be anywherefrom zero to the upper bound estimate. FDA has found that the Kodak epidemiology study is marginally adequateto detect excess deaths from lung and liver cancer if the risk of thesecancers for the exposed workers is 160 percent that of the unexposed workers,but that the study is not able to reliably detect lower risks (Ref. 31).FDA calculations show that the highest risk predicted by the animal datawould be no more than 140 percent that of unexposed workers at the exposurelevels experienced by the Kodak cohort (Ref. 31), a level of risk thatis thus not detectable by the Kodak epidemiology study. Therefore, FDA does not believe that the data from the Eastman Kodak humanepidemiology study refute the animal evidence of the carcinogenicity ofmethylene chloride or the upper bound human risk calculated from the mostsensitive species tested (mouse). <ITAG tagnum="81">2. The General Electric Study </ITAG>(19) The agency received two documents, including a preprint of a papersubmitted for publication in a scientific journal (Ref. 33), that describean epidemiology study on women employees in the coiling and wire drawingarea of the lamp manufacturing department at the Canadian General Electricplant in Toronto, ON, Canada. The study investigators reported a higherthan normal occurrence of breast and gynecological cancers among theseemployees. The submitters of this study believe that the study implicatesmethylene chloride as the causative agent. The agency disagrees that this study shows an association between methylenechloride and the reported excess breast and gynecological cancers foundin women employees (Ref. 34). No exposure assessment was done, either qualitativelyor quantitatively, for methylene chloride. Although methylene chlorideis on a list of chemicals purchased for use in the coiling and wire drawingarea in 1984, there is no indication as to how much was actually used in1984 or other years; as to the methylene chloride levels present in thecoiling and wire drawing area; and as to the methylene chloride levelspresent in other areas of the plant. Finally, the study investigators themselvesstate that no conclusions can be drawn about the relationship between theuse of methylene chloride and the reported increase in cancer. In addition, the agency believes that the finding of a significant excessof breast and gynecological cancers in this study is of questionable validity.This result was obtained by grouping increases in breast cancer and gynecologicalcancer incidence that were individually insignificant, without increasingthe criterion for statistical significance to allow for a greater numberof comparisons. In fact, if the appropriate adjustment for multiple comparisonsis made, the study does not show a significant increase in the incidenceof breast and gynecological cancer among these employees. <ITAG tagnum="84">VII. Characterizing the Risks </ITAG>(20) One comment suggested that there is only weak evidence that methylenechloride is a carcinogen. The comment pointed out that the InternationalWorking Party of Experts had developed a set of categories for classifyingcarcinogens. The comment argued that methylene chloride should be placedin the fourth of these categories, which includes substances that haveonly potential relevance to humans and that do not require an automaticregulatory response.The agency does not agree with the comment's conclusion on evidence ofcarcinogenicity. As explained above, the agency has determined that theevidence of carcinogenicity for methylene chloride is sufficient to concludethat this substance is an animal carcinogen. An International Agency forResearch on Cancer (IARC) working group also reviewed the carcinogenicitydata on methylene chloride and concluded that ``There is sufficient evidencefor the carcinogenicity of dichloromethane to experimental animals'' (Ref.4.). Furthermore, NTP concluded, with respect to their inhalation studyon methylene chloride, that there was clear evidence of carcinogenicityin B<T2>6</T2>C<T2>3</T2>F<T2>1</T2> mice and female F344 rats and some evidence of carcinogenicityin male F344 rats (Ref. 5).(21) Some comments objected to the agency's proposal on the basis thatit called methylene chloride a probable human carcinogen.In the proposal of December 18, 1985, FDA did not state that methylenechloride was a probable human carcinogen, but rather that methylene chloride``* * * may be carcinogenic to humans.'' FDA based this statement on thefindings from animal bioassays. It is the agency's policy that substancesthat are carcinogenic to animals, as methylene chloride has been foundto be, should be considered potential human carcinogens unless there isevidence to the contrary.Rodent species such as rats and mice have been accepted by the scientificcommunity as appropriate surrogates for humans in toxicity testing, includingcarcinogenesis testing. Experimental evidence has established a high correlationbetween the ability of a substance to induce cancer in rodents and itsability to induce cancer in humans (Refs. 35, 36, and 37). The agency concluded,based on the NTP inhalation studies on rodents and other relevant information,that methylene chloride is an animal carcinogen by inhalation. Becausemethylene chloride induces cancer in rodents, it may also do so in humans.This view is shared by IARC, which stated that ``in the absence of adequatedata on humans, it is reasonable, for practical purposes, to regard chemicalsfor which there is sufficient evidence for carcinogenicity in animals asif they presented a carcinogenic risk to humans'' (Ref. 38). To ensureprotection of the public health, the agency will treat positive resultsfrom well-conducted carcinogenicity studies in animals as strong evidencethat the compound considered represents a carcinogenic hazard to humansand will characterize the risk using these studies unless evidence fromstudies on humans indicates otherwise.(22) One comment stated: ``According to the FDA, 1 in every 100 hairdresserswill die from continued use of aerosol hair sprays that contain methylenechloride. This is clearly an unacceptable risk.''The agency did not state that a number of hairdressers will die from thisuse. The proposal said that for hair care specialists, the upper boundof lifetime risk of contracting cancer (not the risk of dying) is in therange of 1 in 100 to 1 in 1,000. This estimate is not an actuarial risk.Moreover, it does not refer to every hairdresser but only to those thatuse aerosol cosmetic products that contain methylene chloride consistentlyover a prolonged period. Nonetheless, the agency does believe, based onthe available data, that there is a significant potential risk to users.Therefore, the agency is prohibiting the use of methylene chloride in aerosolcosmetics.<ITAG tagnum="84">VIII. Other Comments</ITAG>A. Halogenated Solvents Industry Petition(23) The Halogenated Solvents Industry Alliance (HSIA) submitted a petition(Docket No. 86P-0443) requesting that FDA terminate its rulemaking to banthe use of methylene chloride as an ingredient in cosmetic products. HSIAargued that there are apparently acceptable substitutes for methylene chloridein cosmetics, and that, to their knowledge, ``all or virtually all manufacturersor formulators have now switched to other ingredients for cosmetic usesin which methylene chloride was previously employed.'' Thus, HSIA concludedthat actual consumer exposure is truly de minimis, and that no benefitswould result from regulating the use of methylene chloride in cosmetics.HSIA stated further that, because consumer exposure to methylene chloridefrom cosmetics is negligible, it is unnecessary and inappropriate for FDAto continue devoting resources to resolving scientific uncertainties inherentin what would now be only a hypothetical situation. HSIA cited as its basisregulatory policy guideline number 4 from the August 11, 1983, Report ofthe Presidential Task Force on Regulatory Relief, ``Reagan AdministrationRegulatory Achievements,'' which is referenced in section 1(d) of ExecutiveOrder 12498. Guideline number 4 states that regulations should addressrisks that are real and significant rather than hypothetical or remote.HSIA further requested that FDA reopen the comment period for submissionof comments on the issue of actual use and consumer exposure if FDA believesthat additional data are needed to show the absence of any use of methylenechloride in cosmetics.The agency does not agree that a regulation prohibiting use of methylenechloride as an ingredient in cosmetics is no longer necessary. The agencyis concerned that in the absence of a regulation prohibiting such use,firms could subject the public to methylene chloride exposure from aerosolcosmetic products at any time. Until recently, the information availableto the agency was consistent with HSIA's claim that methylene chlorideis not being used as an ingredient in cosmetic products. However, the agencyreceived a letter dated November 30, 1988, from a law firm stating thatits client uses methylene chloride in certain aerosol cosmetic products.This letter explained that this company had removed methylene chloridefrom its products after FDA published its proposal, but that the companydecided to resume use of methylene chloride because company officials believedthat (1) more favorable information had appeared to support the safetyof methylene chloride, (2) FDA had stayed the final action (which it hadnot), and (3) consumers of their products preferred them formulated withmethylene chloride.The company's actions demonstrate why this regulation is needed to avoidambiguity about both the legal status of methylene chloride and the riskassociated with its use. Although the agency could take enforcement actionunder section 601 of the act (21 U.S.C. 361) in cases involving the useof methylene chloride in a cosmetic product when the agency becomes awareof such a product, the agency believes that a prohibitive regulation isa more effective way of protecting the public health. This regulation providesnotice to future as well as current manufacturers of cosmetic productsthat methylene chloride should not be used because of the significant potentialrisk.With respect to application of regulatory policy guideline number 4, theagency has concluded that methylene chloride may be a human carcinogen,and that the potential risk from the use of this substance in cosmeticsis not hypothetical or remote. Furthermore, a primary concern of guideline4 is cost-benefit assessment. If, as HSIA argued, manufacturers were nolonger using methylene chloride in cosmetics, and if, as HSIA presumablybelieved, a prohibitive regulation is not necessary to preclude the useof methylene chloride in cosmetics, this action would have no or negligiblecosts. The resumption of use of methylene chloride by one manufacturerthat has methylene chloride-free formulations available does not changethe conclusion that the costs of this action will be negligible. B. Other Agencies' Regulation of Methylene Chloride (24) Two comments pointed out that the Environmental Protection Agency(EPA), the Consumer Product Safety Commission (CPSC), and the OccupationalSafety and Health Administration (OSHA), as well as FDA, are evaluatingthe data on methylene chloride. The comments argued that these other agenciesare not proposing any regulatory action at this time and urged FDA notto be precipitous in acting on methylene chloride. These comments urgedFDA to be consistent with the other agencies. FDA is aware of the consideration of methylene chloride by other agencies.However, each agency administers different statutes, and its regulatoryresponse must meet the requirements of the applicable statute. FDA's findings are consistent with the conclusions of the CPSC on methylenechloride. On August 20, 1986 (51 FR 29778), CPSC proposed to find thatmethylene chloride may be a human carcinogen by inhalation and may be considereda hazardous substance under the Federal Hazardous Substances Act (FHSA).Without withdrawing the proposed rule, CPSC published a notice of interpretationand enforcement policy on September 14, 1987 (52 FR 34698). This noticeconcluded that ``* * * the Commission believes that household productsthat present a significant exposure to methylene chloride vapor are hazardoussubstances due to a potential hazard of human carcinogenicity.'' CPSC statedits intention to bring enforcement actions under FHSA for products thatdo not comply with the labeling required by FHSA for hazardous substances.Full compliance of labels for these products was required by September14, 1988. FDA also notes that OSHA published an advance notice of proposed rulemakingon methylene chloride (51 FR 42257; November 24, 1986) in which it concludedthat there is sufficient evidence of carcinogenicity in two species andpositive indications of mutations in three organisms, but that the humanepidemiology data are inconclusive. In addition, EPA has initiated a regulatoryinvestigation [50 FR 42037; October 17, 1985]. Concerning the timing of FDA's action relative to actions by other agencies,FDA believes that, when faced with a public health hazard such as the hazardfrom methylene chloride in aerosol cosmetics, it is obligated to act whenit has a sound basis for a decision. FDA has completed its evaluation ofthe comments and other relevant information and has determined that ithas a sound basis for this action. Therefore, FDA is taking this actioneven though other agencies may not have reached the same point in theirrulemaking. C. Effective Date (25) Three comments requested that any final regulation to prohibit theuse of methylene chloride in cosmetics provide more time than that providedin the proposal for distribution of products already manufactured and fordevelopment of replacement products. One comment requested a 6-month periodand a second comment requested at least a 1-year period between publicationof the final order and its effective date to allow reformulation of productsand testing for stability. The agency proposed that a regulation in this proceeding would take effect60 days after the date of publication of the final rule and would be applicableonly to products initially introduced or initially delivered for introductioninto interstate commerce after that time. This final rule affirms the 60-dayperiod between publication and the effective date. Thus, the ban appliesonly to products initially introduced or initially delivered for introductioninto interstate commerce on or after August 28, 1989. Products introducedinto interstate commerce before that date will not be affected. FDA concludes that a 6-month or a 1-year delay in the effectiveness ofthis regulation is not necessary. The 60-day period following the publicationof this final rule is sufficient for cosmetic manufacturers to comply withthe requirements of this regulation. Information submitted by a trade association and a law firm and the resultsof a survey of firms participating in the voluntary filing of cosmeticproduct ingredient statements (under 21 CFR Part 720) demonstrate thatthe manufacturers of hair sprays generally reformulated their productsto replace methylene chloride either before or shortly after the publicationon December 18, 1985, of the proposal to ban its use as a cosmetic ingredient.Furthermore, firms have had more than 3 years' notice of this action and,therefore, have had ample time to refine methylene chloride-free formulationsand to develop contingency plans to deal with the proposed 60-day effectivedate. Accordingly, the agency believes that the 60-day period is sufficientfor the manufacturers and the marketers of aerosol cosmetics to resolvewhatever matters may be pending with respect to the manufacture and distributionof their methylene chloride-free formulations. D. Request to Reopen Record (26) One comment in a letter dated November 30, 1988, requested that FDAreopen the record to reconsider the need to ban the use of methylene chloridein aerosol cosmetics based on new risk assessment data submitted to FDAin June 1988. The comment also stated that, if FDA still chooses to banmethylene chloride, the agency should inform consumers in the preambleto any final rule as to the lack of any proof that methylene chloride presentsa risk to humans when used in aerosol cosmetic products. The agency disagrees that the record should be reopened. Even though thereport submitted in June 1988 (Ref. 18) was submitted to the agency wellafter the close of the last official comment period (January 5, 1987),the agency reviewed it, as well as other reports that were submitted late,and found nothing in these reports that would affect FDA's decision toprohibit the use of methylene chloride as an ingredient in cosmetics. Furthermore,the new information has been on display at the Dockets Management Branchin the file on this rulemaking for a number of months. Therefore, the agencybelieves interested persons have had ample opportunity to comment on it.FDA also disagrees that it should inform consumers that there is no proofthat methylene chloride presents a risk to humans when used in aerosolcosmetic products. It is because of the evidence that risks to consumersmay be high that the agency is concluding that methylene chloride as aningredient in cosmetics may render these cosmetics injurious to users.If FDA were convinced that there was no evidence that this use of methylenechloride presented a significant public health hazard, the agency wouldnot issue this rule prohibiting this use of methylene chloride. <ITAG tagnum="84">IX. Summary and Conclusions </ITAG>After evaluating all available data the agency concludes that methylenechloride is carcinogenic by inhalation in mice, and that there is suggestiveevidence of a tumorigenic effect of methylene chloride in rats.Epidemiological data on workers exposed to methylene chloride do not indicateany carcinogenic effect in humans. However, FDA finds that the sensitivityof the study is insufficient to rule out the possibility that methylenechloride can cause cancer in humans, as inferred from the rodent studies.Substantial new information on the metabolism and mechanism of action ofmethylene chloride was submitted to the agency. Several comments arguedthat these metabolic data should be incorporated into the carcinogenicrisk assessment process through the use of a physiologically-based pharmacokineticmodel approach. The postulated metabolic mechanism is that the carcinogenicity of methylenechloride in rodents, and any potential carcinogenicity in humans, is causedsolely by the formation of active GST metabolites. FDA concludes that thispostulated mechanism is scientifically plausible but has not been adequatelysupported. The available evidence is insufficient to explain how lung orliver tumors were caused in the mouse by the postulated mechanism and torule out that inhaled methylene chloride directly causes lung tumors inmice, and that it may have the same effect in humans. Therefore, the agencyhas not used the physiologically-based pharmacokinetic model approach toreduce the estimated risk of cancer for users of aerosol cosmetics containingmethylene chloride. Consequently, the agency affirms that the estimatedrisks presented in the proposal are appropriate upper bound estimates ofrisk for humans exposed to methylene chloride from aerosol cosmetics. Because the exposure to methylene chloride from hair spray use can be high,the potential cancer risk from this use may be high. Therefore, the agencyconcludes that methylene chloride is a poisonous or deleterious substancethat may render cosmetic products injurious to users.<ITAG tagnum="84">X. Impact Analyses</ITAG>In the proposed rule, the agency explained that the effects of this actionhad been considered in accordance with the Regulatory Flexibility Act andwith Executive Order 12291.(27) One comment said that the proposal violated Executive Orders 12498and 12291 because the agency did not make the best estimates of the risksfrom methylene chloride uses, only extremely conservative estimates. Thecomment argued that without the best estimates of risks, it is not possibleto know what value to put on the costs of the action or what degree ofprotection the public received from the action. The agency disagrees with the comment and finds that it is possible toestimate the cost of the proposed ban without a best estimate of risk.The agency estimated the cost of the proposed ban in its threshold assessmentin 1985 by calculating the amount of methylene chloride then used in cosmetics,the changes required by a ban, and the costs of these changes. The agencyfound that the proposed action did not meet the criteria for a major ruledescribed in Executive Order 12291. In addition, since the proposal was published, the Halogenated SolventsIndustry Alliance has submitted a citizen petition that states that manufacturersof cosmetics in the United States have already reformulated their hairsprays to remove methylene chloride on their own initiative, and that thereis practically no use of methylene chloride in cosmetics in this country.In a letter dated November 30, 1988, FDA has been told that one firm hasresumed using methylene chloride in certain aerosol cosmetics. Notwithstandingthe cost to this firm of converting production back to its methylene chloride-freeformulations, the agency finds that the costs of prohibiting the use ofmethylene chloride in hair spray are essentially negligible. The agencyhas received no other relevant information on the economic impact of thisaction. The agency has previously considered the environmental effects of thisrule as announced in the proposed rule (50 FR 51551). No new informationor comments have been received that would affect the agency's previousdetermination that there is no significant impact on the human environmentand that an environmental impact statement is not required. The informationthat use of methylene chloride in cosmetics has essentially ceased servesto reinforce this finding of no significant impact. <ITAG tagnum="84">XI. References </ITAG>The following references have been placed on display in the Dockets ManagementBranch, Food and Drug Administration, Rm. 4-62, 5600 Fishers Lane, Rockville,MD and may be seen by interested persons between 9 a.m. and 4 p.m., Mondaythrough Friday.<ITAG tagnum="21">1. Memorandum of Meeting of Advisory Panel to the National CancerInstitute on the proposed methylene chloride epidemiology study, June 10,1987. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">2. Maltoni, C., Food Solvents Workshop I: Methylene Chloride, NutritionFoundation, Bethesda, MD., pp. 67-75 and 92-95, March 8 and 9, 1984. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">3. Memorandum of August 22, 1985, by C. Lin, Division of Toxicology,FDA. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">4. International Agency for Research on Cancer, ``Dichloromethane,''IARC Monographs on the Evaluation of the Carcinogenic Risk of Chemicalsto Humans, 41:43-85, 1986. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">5. National Toxicology Program, ``NTP Technical Report on the Toxicologyand Carcinogenesis Studies of Dichloromethane (Methylene Chloride) in F344/NRats and B<T2>6</T2>C<T2>3</T2>F<T2>l</T2> Mice (Inhalation Studies),'' NTP TR 306, January 1986. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">6. Haseman, J.K., et al., ``Neoplasms Observed in Untreated and CornOil Gavage Control Groups of F344/N Rats and (C57BL/6N X C3H/Hen) F1 (B<T2>6</T2>C<T2>3</T2>F<T2>l</T2>) Mice,'' <T3>Journal of the National Cancer Institute, </T3>75:975-984, 1985. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">7. Cancer Assessment Committee, Memorandum of Conferences, ``MethyleneChloride,'' January 20, 1983, August 8, 1984, and June 13, 1985. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">8. Memorandum of April 23, 1985, by the Quantitative Risk AssessmentCommittee, FDA. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">9. Hext, P.M., J. Foster, and S.W. Millward, ``Methylene Chloride(Dichloromethane): 10 Day Inhalation Toxicity Study to Investigate theEffects on Rat and Mouse Liver and Lungs,'' January 1986. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">10. Green, T., et al., ``Methylene Chloride (Dichloromethane): TheEffects of Exposure to 4000 ppm on Mouse Lung Enzymes,'' October 1987.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">11. Witschi, H., and W.M. Haschek, ``Cells of Origin of Lung Tumorsin Mice,'' <T3>Journal of the National Cancer Institute, </T3>70:991, 1983. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">12. Beer, D.G., and A.M. Malkinson, ``Genetic Influence on Type 2or Clara Cell Origin of Pulmonary Adenomas in Urethan-treated Mice,'' <T3>Journal of the National Cancer Institute, </T3>75:963-967, 1985. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">13. Memorandum of October 27, 1986, by V.C. Dunkel, Genetic ToxicologyBranch, FDA, with attachments and references.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">14. Memoranda of January 5, 1987, and May 20, 1986, by G. Cramer,Regulatory Food Chemistry Branch, FDA. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">15. Andersen, M.E., et al., ``Physiologically Based Pharmacokineticsand the Risk Assessment Process for Methylene Chloride,'' preprint, January19, 1986. (Since published in <T3>Toxicology and Applied Pharmacology, </T3>87:185-205, 1987.) </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">16. Reitz, R.H., et al., ``Incorporation of In Vitro Enzyme Data intothe PB-PK Model for Methylene Chloride (CH<T2>2</T2>CL<T2>2</T2>): Implications for Risk Assessment,'' preprint, dated 4/18/88.(Since published in <T3>Toxicology Letters, </T3>43:97-116, 1988.) </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">17. Green, T., et al., ``Methylene Chloride (Dichloromethane): HumanRisk Assessment Using Experimental Animal Data,'' May 1988. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">18. Green, T., et al., ``Methylene Chloride (Dichloromethane): <T3>In Vivo </T3>Inhalation Pharmacokinetics and Metabolism in F344 Ratsand B<T2>6</T2>C<T2>3</T2>F<T2>1</T2> Mice,'' September 1986. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">19. Green, T., J.A. Nash, and G. Mainwaring, ``Methylene Chloride(Dichloromethane): <T3>In Vitro </T3>Metabolism in Rat, Mouse and Hamster Liver and Lung Fractionsand in Human Liver Fractions,'' September 1986. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">20. Reitz, R.H., A.L. Mendrala, and A.M. Schumann, ``Methylene Chloride-GlutathioneS-Transferase Studies: <T3>In Vitro </T3>Experiments in Humans, Mice, Rats, and Hamsters,'' July1987. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">21. Green, T., W.M. Provan, and N. Gowans, ``Methylene Chloride (Dichloromethane):<T3>In Vivo </T3>Inhalation Pharmacokinetics in B<T2>6</T2>C<T2>3</T2>F<T2>1</T2> Mice (Using Stable Isotopes) and F344 Rats,'' October 1987.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">22. Green, T., J.A. Nash, and S.J.  Hill, ``Methylene Chloride (Dichloromethane):Glutathione-S-Transferase Metabolism In Vitro in Rat, Mouse, Hamster andHuman Liver Cytosol Fractions,'' October 1987. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">23. Memorandum of June 27, 1984, by V. Frankos, Division of Toxicology,FDA. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">24. Gargas, M.L., H.J. Clewell III, and M.E. Andersen, ``Metabolismof Inhaled Dihalomethanes <T3>In Vivo: </T3>Differentiation of Kinetic Constants for Two IndependentPathways,'' <T3>Toxicology and Applied Pharmacology, </T3>82:211-223, 1986. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">25. Memoranda of December 19, 1986, by the Quantitative Risk AssessmentCommittee; of December 23, 1986, by R. Brown, Division of Mathematics;and of December 19, 1988, by the Quantitative Risk Assessment Committee,FDA. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">26. European Chemical Industry Ecology and Toxicology Centre, ``TechnicalReport No. 26: The Assessment of Carcinogenic Hazard for Human Beings Exposedto Methylene Chloride,'' Brussels, January 1987. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">27. Friedlander, B.R., T. Hearne, and S. Hall, ``Epidemiologic Investigationof Employees Chronically Exposed to Methylene Chloride: Mortality Analysis,''<T3>Journal of Occupational Medicine, </T3>20:657-666, 1978. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">28. Hearne, F.T., and B.R. Friedlander, ``Follow-up of Methylene ChlorideStudy,'' <T3>Journal of Occupational Medicine, </T3>23:660, 1981. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">29. Hearne, F.T., et al., ``Methylene Chloride Mortality Study: Dose-ResponseCharacterization and Animal Model Comparison,'' <T3>Journal of Occupational Medicine, </T3>29:217-228, 1987. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">30. Memorandum of December 2, 1985, by L. Tollefson, Epidemiologyand Clinical Toxicology Unit, FDA. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">31. Memoranda of November 10, 1986 and August 27, 1987, by the QuantitativeRisk Assessment Committee, FDA.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">32. Tollefson, L., et al., ``Human and Animal Risk Comparisons,''<T3>Journal of Occupational Medicine,</T3> 30:18-19, 22, 1988. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">33. Shannon, H.S., et al., ``Cancer Morbidity in Lamp ManufacturingWorkers,'' Preprint. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">34. Memorandum of July 22, 1987, by L. Tollefson, Epidemiology andClinical Toxicology Staff, FDA. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">35. Wilbourn, J.D., et al., ``Response of Experimental Animals toHuman Carcinogens: An Analysis Based upon the IARC Monographs Programme,''<T3>Carcinogenesis,</T3> 7:1853-1863, 1986. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">36. Wilbourn, J.D., et al., ``Identification of Chemicals Carcinogenicto Man,'' <T3>Toxicologic Pathology,</T3> 12:397-399, 1984. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">37. Tomatis, L., ``The Predictive Value of Rodent CarcinogenicityTests in the Evaluation of Human Risks,'' <T3>Annual Review of Pharmacology and Toxicology,</T3> 19:511-530, 1979.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">38. International Agency for Research on Cancer, IARC Monographs onthe Evaluation of the Carcinogenic Risk of Chemicals to Humans, 41:13-32(preamble), 1986.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="84">XII. Agency Action </ITAG>FDA has evaluated the comments on the proposal of December 18, 1985, thenew information submitted with the comments, and the information alreadyin the agency's files. FDA believes that the evidence establishes that methylene chloride is apoisonous or deleterious substance, and that its use in cosmetic productsmay render those products injurious to users. Under section 601(a) of the act (21 U.S.C. 361(a)), a cosmetic is deemedto be adulterated ``(i)f it bears or contains any poisonous or deleterioussubstance which may render it injurious to users under the conditions ofuse prescribed in the labeling thereof, or, under such conditions of useas are customary or usual * * *.'' Therefore, FDA concludes that cosmeticsthat contain methylene chloride are adulterated under section 601(a) ofthe act, and the agency is consequently prohibiting the use of methylenechloride in cosmetic products. FDA has been informed that, except for one firm that has resumed use ofmethylene chloride in aerosol cosmetics, the use of methylene chloridein manufacturing hair sprays has virtually ceased in the United States.The agency believes, however, that a regulation is necessary to ensurethat all hair spray manufacturers cease using methylene chloride, thathair sprays containing methylene chloride are not imported into this country,and that no new hair sprays or other cosmetics using methylene chlorideas an ingredient are introduced into the market. This prohibition of the use of methylene chloride in cosmetics is effectiveAugust 28, 1989. This effective date applies to the initial introductionof products, and the initial delivery of products for introduction, intointerstate commerce. <ITAG tagnum="84">List of Subjects in 21 CFR Part 700 </ITAG>Cosmetics, Packaging and containers. Therefore, under the Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act and under authoritydelegated to the Commissioner of Food and Drugs, Part 700 is amended asfollows:  <ITAG tagnum="52">PART 700_GENERAL</ITAG>1. The authority citation for 21 CFR Part 700 is revised to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Authority:</T4> Secs. 601, 602, 701(a), 704, 52 Stat. 1054 as amended,1055, 67 Stat. 477 as amended (21 U.S.C. 361, 362, 371(a), 374); 21 CFR5.10, 5.11.</ITAG>2. A new andSection; 700.19 is added to Subpart B to read as follows: <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 700.19</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Use of methylene chloride as an ingredient of cosmetic products. </ITAG>(a) Methylene chloride has been used as an ingredient of aerosol cosmeticproducts, principally hair sprays, at concentrations generally rangingfrom 10 to 25 percent. In a 2-year animal inhalation study sponsored bythe National Toxicology Program, methylene chloride produced a significantincrease in benign and malignant tumors of the lung and liver of male andfemale mice. Based on these findings and on estimates of human exposurefrom the customary use of hair sprays, the Food and Drug Administrationconcludes that the use of methylene chloride in cosmetic products posesa significant cancer risk to consumers, and that the use of this ingredientin cosmetic products may render these products injurious to health. (b) Any cosmetic product that contains methylene chloride as an ingredientis deemed adulterated and is subject to regulatory action under sections301 and 601(a) of the Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act.<ITAG tagnum="21">Dated: January 12, 1989. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="6">Frank E. Young, </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="4">Commissioner of Food and Drugs. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="40">[FR Doc. 89-15355 Filed 6-28-89; 8:45 am] </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="68">BILLING CODE 4160-01-M</ITAG></ITAG></ITAG></TEXT></DOC>